Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5429YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2116 Section 1. Section 261H.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. The president, vice presidents, 3 deans, department directors, or any other administrator of a 4 public institution of higher education shall ensure that all 5 employees of the public institution of higher education under 6 the supervision of such person, whether directly or indirectly, 7 and all contractors engaged by such person, whether directly 8 or indirectly, to provide staff or student training receive 9 training related to the requirements and prohibitions of this 10 section. 11 Sec. 2. Section 279.74, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 2. a. Each school district may continue training that 14 fosters a workplace and learning environment that is respectful 15 of all employees and students. However, the superintendent of 16 each school district , each employee of the school district, 17 each contractor hired by the school district, and each 18 volunteer engaged by the school district shall ensure that 19 any all curriculum or mandatory provided by the employee, 20 contractor, or volunteer; all educational materials provided 21 to students by the employee, contractor, or volunteer; and 22 all staff or student training provided by an the employee , of 23 the school district or by a contractor hired by the school 24 district , or volunteer does not teach, advocate, encourage, 25 promote, or act upon specific stereotyping and scapegoating 26 toward others on the basis of demographic group membership or 27 identity. This subsection paragraph shall not be construed 28 as preventing an employee , or contractor , or volunteer who 29 teaches any curriculum or who provides mandatory training from 30 responding to questions regarding specific defined concepts 31 raised by participants in the training. 32 b. (1) A school district shall not expend any moneys 33 appropriated by the general assembly or any other moneys 34 derived from bequests, charges, deposits, donations, 35 -1- LSB 5429YH (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 2116 endowments, fees, grants, gifts, income, receipts, tuition, 1 chapter 257, or any other source to provide any curriculum, 2 educational materials, or staff or student training, either 3 directly or indirectly, that violates paragraph âaâ . 4 (2) A school district shall not use any of the school 5 districtâs resources, facilities, or staff or student time 6 to violate paragraph âaâ or encourage any person to violate 7 paragraph âaâ . 8 Sec. 3. Section 279.74, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsections: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. The superintendent of each school 11 district shall ensure that all of the following individuals 12 receive training related to the requirements and prohibitions 13 of this section: 14 a. Employees of the school district. 15 b. Contractors hired by the school district to provide 16 curriculum, educational materials, or staff or student 17 training. 18 c. Volunteers engaged by the school district to provide 19 curriculum, educational materials, or staff or student 20 training. 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 2B. a. Any of the following individuals 22 may bring a civil action for injunctive relief against a school 23 district to prohibit the school district from continuing to 24 violate this section: 25 (1) The parent or guardian of a student who is enrolled in 26 the school district. 27 (2) An employee of the school district. 28 (3) A resident of the school district. 29 b. This subsection shall not be construed to require an 30 individual bringing a civil action under paragraph âaâ to 31 demonstrate that the individual was harmed by the school 32 districtâs violation of this section. 33 Sec. 4. Section 279.74, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 34 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -2- LSB 5429YH (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 4 H.F. 2116 d. Create Except as provided in subsection 2B, create any 1 right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at 2 law or in equity by any party against the state of Iowa, its 3 departments, agencies, or entities, its officers, employees, 4 or agents, or any other person. 5